Vermont statutes. Title 13 Crimes and Criminal Procedure
Subchapter 1. Arrest and Complaint

§ 5501.
Repealed.
1973, No. 118, § 25, eff. Oct. 1, 1973.

§ 5502.
Copy of process for accused.

When an officer does not within six hours deliver a true copy of the warrant or process by which he or she detains a person in a criminal proceeding, to a person who demands such copy and tenders the fees therefor, he or she shall forfeit to such person $200.00.

§ 5503.
Recognizance by complainant.

A warrant to apprehend a person charged with a criminal offense shall not be granted by a district judge except on information or complaint of an informing or complaining officer, until such magistrate has taken security to his or her satisfaction, by way of recognizance to the person so charged, that the prosecutor will answer the damages if he or she does not prosecute his or her information to effect, and a minute of such recognizance shall be made as in civil causes.

HISTORY:

Amended 1965, No. 194, § 10, operative February 1, 1967; 1973, No. 249 (Adj. Sess.), § 52, eff. April 9, 1974.

§ 5504.
Repealed. 2017, No. 93 (Adj. Sess.), § 14.

§§ 5505-5510.
Repealed. 1973, No. 118, § 25, eff. Oct. 1, 1973.

§ 5511.
Notification of unemancipated minor’s parent or guardian.

A law enforcement officer who arrests an unemancipated minor shall take reasonable steps to notify, as soon as reasonably practicable, a parent or guardian of the minor:

that the minor has been arrested;

the location where the minor is being held if still in law enforcement custody; and

the nature of the criminal charge against the minor.

If the minor is cited to appear in court, a copy of the citation shall promptly be mailed to the last known address of a parent or guardian of the minor.

HISTORY:

Added 1997, No. 153 (Adj. Sess.), § 2.